Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.02
Ambulatory surgical center, defined.

Ambulatory surgical center has the same meaning as in section 71-405.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 429, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 145;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5804;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 113.